Hawaii statutes.
[§305J-9] Authorization to operate in the State; seminary or religious
training institutions. (a) To operate in the
State, a seminary or religious training institution
shall:

(1) Be party to a reciprocity agreement to which the
State is a member; or

(2) Apply for, on a form prescribed by the
department, and receive authorization from the director; provided that the
institution shall establish that it qualifies as a bona fide religious training
institution and as an institution of post-secondary education.

(b)
Nothing in this section shall preclude a seminary or religious training
institution from seeking accreditation. [L 2013, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next